Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 85-1001 to 85-1007, unless the context otherwise requires, center shall mean the Nebraska Safety Center created under section 85-1003.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 57.
July 1, 2026